Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.130

City property—Assessment.

Every city and town shall include in its annual tax levy an amount sufficient to pay all unpaid assessments with all interest, penalties, and charges thereon levied against all lands belonging to the city or town. The proceeds of such a portion of the tax levy shall be placed in a separate fund to be known as the "city (or town) property assessments redemption fund" and by the city or town treasurer inviolably applied in payment of any unpaid assessment liens on any lands belonging to the city or town.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.130. Prior: (i) 1929 c 183 s 1; 1909 c 130 s 1; RRS s 9344. (ii) 1929 c 183 s 2, part; 1909 c 130 s 2, part; RRS s 9345, part.]